District of Columbia statutes.
7-2047

Prosecutions.

(a)

Prosecutions of violations of this subchapter shall be brought by the Corporation Counsel in the name of the District of Columbia.

(b)

In prosecutions initiated pursuant to this subchapter, a child development facility claiming an exemption from a licensing requirement of this subchapter shall have the burden of proving entitlement to the exemption.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 18, 46 DCR 274

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3637.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.